District of Columbia statutes.
44-108.04

Short-term residential care.

For individuals who will stay in the ALR no longer than 30 days, only the following information is required for admission to the ALR:

(1)

An analysis of the individual’s current physical condition, medical status, and functional assessment as set out in this subchapter; and

(2)

A resident agreement in accordance with this chapter.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 804, 47 DCR 2647